Missouri, session 2026, SB1637.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 209, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 209.247, to read as
follows:
209.247. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri commission for the deaf
and hard of hearing;
(2) "Communication access services", shall include,
but not be limited to, the following:
(a) Qualified interpreters, as described in section
209.285;
(b) Communication access realtime translation services;
(c) Notetakers, visual or Braille boards, and visual
video services;
(d) Open and closed captioning services;
(e) Environmental access support for the deaf-blind
and those with low vision; and
(f) Any other effective method of making aurally
delivered and printed information available to individuals
who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing;

SB 1637 2
(3) "Communication access service provider", an
individual who is trained to offer a communication access
service to communicate aurally delivered and printed
information to individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard
of hearing.
2. The commission shall establish a statewide
communication access services program to improve compliance
with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act for
agencies and businesses by coordinating resources, filling
service gaps, and assisting with costs related to
accommodations. The commission shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a statewide registry of
communication access service providers, organized by region,
including rural and urban areas;
(2) Create a process for communication access service
providers to apply for placement on the registry;
(3) Establish minimum standards for training,
equipment, and technology;
(4) Maintain an informational website accessible by
businesses, agencies, and individuals who are deaf, deaf-
blind, or hard of hearing regarding resources and available
programming;
(5) Provide consultation, training, and technical
assistance to aid state and local agencies to be in
compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act;
(6) Provide information regarding available resources
to assist with compliance costs and to support potential
communication access service providers in underserved areas;
(7) Conduct outreach activities for urban or rural
residents and communication access service providers to
expand awareness and capacity in underserved areas;

SB 1637 3
(8) Subject to appropriation, administer scholarships
for professional development, internships, and certification
testing;
(9) Subject to appropriation and pursuant to rules
promulgated under this section, administer and finance
requests for communication access services between agencies
and businesses and individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or
hard of hearing;
(10) Hire a program manager to serve at the pleasure
of the director of the commission. The program manager
shall have a background and experience in communication
access services. The salary for the program manager shall
be paid out of the fund established in subsection 3 of this
section; and
(11) Submit an annual report to the governor and the
general assembly that includes information on communication
access service utilization, registry effectiveness, funding
outcomes, and recommendations for improvement.
3. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Communication Access Services Fund", which shall
consist of moneys appropriated to the fund and any gifts,
donations, grants, and bequests from individuals, private
organizations, foundations, or other sources for the purpose
of administering the program established in this section.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund
shall be used by the commission for the salary of the
program manager, distribution of financial assistance for
communication access services, and distribution of
scholarships under this section.

SB 1637 4
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
4. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section, including the process for
distributing scholarships under subdivision (8) of
subsection 2 of this section and determining eligibility for
financial assistance under subdivision (9) of subsection 2
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
100 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
101 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
102 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
103 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
104 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
105 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓